Nevada, session 83, SB371.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Sections 1-4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. NRS 207.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
207.200 1. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to
NRS 200.603, any person who, under circumstances not amounting
to a burglary:
(a) Goes upon the land or into any building of another with
intent to vex or annoy the owner or occupant thereof, or to commit
any unlawful act; or
(b) Willfully goes or remains upon any land or in any building
after having been warned during the previous [24] 36 months by the
owner or occupant thereof not to trespass,
 is guilty of a misdemeanor. The meaning of this subsection is not
limited by subsections 2 and 4.
2. A sufficient warning against trespassing, within the meaning
of this section, is given by any of the following methods:
(a) Painting with fluorescent orange paint:
(1) Not less than 50 square inches of a structure or natural
object or the top 12 inches of a post, whether made of wood, metal
or other material, at:
(I) Intervals of such a distance as is necessary to ensure
that at least one such structure, natural object or post would be
within the direct line of sight of a person standing next to another
such structure, natural object or post, but at intervals of not more
than 1,000 feet; and
(II) Each corner of the land, upon or near the boundary;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(2) Each side of all gates, cattle guards and openings that are
designed to allow human ingress to the area;
(b) Fencing the area;
(c) Posting “no trespassing” signs or other notice of like
meaning at:
(1) Intervals of such a distance as is necessary to ensure that
at least one such sign would be within the direct line of sight of a
person standing next to another such sign, but at intervals of not
more than 500 feet; and
(2) Each corner of the land, upon or near the boundary;
(d) Using the area as cultivated land; or
(e) By the owner or occupant of the land or building making an
oral or written demand to any guest to vacate the land or building.
3. It is prima facie evidence of trespass for any person to be
found on private or public property which is posted or fenced as
provided in subsection 2 without lawful business with the owner or
occupant of the property.
4. An entryman on land under the laws of the United States is
an owner within the meaning of this section.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Cultivated land” means land that has been cleared of its
natural vegetation and is presently planted with a crop.
(b) “Fence” means a barrier sufficient to indicate an intent to
restrict the area to human ingress, including, but not limited to, a
wall, hedge or chain link or wire mesh fence. The term does not
include a barrier made of barbed wire.
(c) “Guest” means any person entertained or to whom
hospitality is extended, including, but not limited to, any person
who stays overnight. The term does not include a tenant as defined
in NRS 118A.170.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)